Arkansas, session 2025, HB1485.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF ARKANSAS:

SECTION 1. Arkansas Code § 26-52-401, concerning sales tax exemptions
for various products and services, is amended to add an additional
subdivision to read as follows:
(45) Gross receipts or gross proceeds from the sale of tangible
personal property, specified digital products, a digital code, or a service
to:
(A) The Arkansas Veterans Cemetery Foundation; or
(B) An organization that is:
(i) Described in 26 U.S.C. § 501(c)(3), as it
existed on January 1, 2025;
(ii) Registered as a nonprofit with the Secretary of
State; and
(iii) Established to support Veterans' cemeteries in
the state, Veterans' homes in the state, or facilities administered by the
Department of Veterans Affairs.

*JLL057*
02/13/2025 2:14:54 PM JLL057

HB1485
SECTION 2. EFFECTIVE DATE. Section 1 of this act is effective on the
first day of the calendar quarter following the effective date of this act.


































02/13/2025 2:14:54 PM JLL057